test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-subst-2tav-ae_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
  Noun - kárttá:
    kárttá+N+Sg+Nom:  kárˊttá
    kárttá+N+Sg+Gen:  káˊrtá
    kárttá+N+Sg+Acc: káˊrtá
    kárttá+N+Sg+Ill:  káártán
    kárttá+N+Sg+Loc:  kárttáást
    kárttá+N+Sg+Com:  kárttáin
    kárttá+N+Sg+Abe:  káˊrtáttáá
    kárttá+N+Ess:  kárttán
    kárttá+N+Par: kárttád
    kárttá+N+Pl+Nom:  káˊrtáh
    kárttá+N+Pl+Gen:  káˊrtái
    kárttá+N+Pl+Acc:  kárttáid
    kárttá+N+Pl+Ill:  kárttáid
    kárttá+N+Pl+Loc:  káˊrtáin
    kárttá+N+Pl+Com:  káˊrtáiguin
    kárttá+N+Pl+Abe:  káˊrtáittáá

  Noun - kuáddá:
    kuáddá+N+Sg+Nom:  kuádˊdá
    kuáddá+N+Sg+Gen:  kuádá
    kuáddá+N+Sg+Acc: kuádá
    kuáddá+N+Sg+Ill:  kuádán
    kuáddá+N+Sg+Loc:  kuádást
    kuáddá+N+Sg+Com:  kuáddáin
    kuáddá+N+Sg+Abe:  kuáˊdáttáá
    kuáddá+N+Ess:  kuáddán
    kuáddá+N+Par: kuádˊdád
    kuáddá+N+Pl+Nom:  kuádáh
    kuáddá+N+Pl+Gen: [kuádái, kuáˊdái]
    kuáddá+N+Pl+Acc:  kuádáid
    kuáddá+N+Pl+Ill:  kuáddáid
    kuáddá+N+Pl+Loc:  kuádáin
    kuáddá+N+Pl+Com:  kuáˊdáiguin
    kuáddá+N+Pl+Abe:  kuáˊdáittáá

  Noun - puánnjá:
    puánnjá+N+Sg+Nom:  puánˊnjá
    puánnjá+N+Sg+Gen:  puánjá
    puánnjá+N+Sg+Acc: puánjá
    puánnjá+N+Sg+Ill:  puáṇján
    puánnjá+N+Sg+Loc:  puánjást
    puánnjá+N+Sg+Com:  puánˊnjáin
    puánnjá+N+Sg+Abe:  puáˊnjáttáá
    puánnjá+N+Ess:  puánˊnján
    puánnjá+N+Par: puánˊnjád
    puánnjá+N+Pl+Nom:  puánjáh
    puánnjá+N+Pl+Gen: [puánjái, puáˊnjái]
    puánnjá+N+Pl+Acc:  puánjáid
    puánnjá+N+Pl+Ill:  puánnjáid
    puánnjá+N+Pl+Loc:  puáˊnjáin
    puánnjá+N+Pl+Com:  puáˊnjáiguin
    puánnjá+N+Pl+Abe:  puánjáittáá

  Noun - luákká:
    luákká+N+Sg+Nom:  luákˊká
    luákká+N+Sg+Gen:  luáḥá
    luákká+N+Sg+Acc:  luáḥá
    luákká+N+Sg+Ill:  luákán
    luákká+N+Sg+Loc:  luáhást
    luákká+N+Sg+Com:  luáhˊháin
    luákká+N+Sg+Abe:  luáˊháttáá
    luákká+N+Ess:  luákˊkán
    luákká+N+Par: luákˊkád
    luákká+N+Pl+Nom:  luáháh
    luákká+N+Pl+Gen: [luáhái, luáˊhái]
    luákká+N+Pl+Acc:  luáháid
    luákká+N+Pl+Ill:  luáhháid
    luákká+N+Pl+Loc:  luáháin
    luákká+N+Pl+Com:  luáˊháiguin
    luákká+N+Pl+Abe:  luáˊháittáá

  Noun - luákká:
    luákká+N+Sg+Nom:  luákˊká
    luákká+N+Sg+Gen:  luáhá
    luákká+N+Sg+Acc:  luáhá
    luákká+N+Sg+Ill:  luákán
    luákká+N+Sg+Loc:  luáhást
    luákká+N+Sg+Com:  luáhháin
    luákká+N+Sg+Abe:  luáˊháttáá
    luákká+N+Ess:  luákˊkán
    luákká+N+Par: luákˊkád
    luákká+N+Pl+Nom:  luáháh
    luákká+N+Pl+Gen: [luáhái, luáˊhái]
    luákká+N+Pl+Acc:  luáháid
    luákká+N+Pl+Ill:  luáhháid
    luákká+N+Pl+Loc:  luáháin
    luákká+N+Pl+Com:  luáˊháiguin
    luákká+N+Pl+Abe:  luáˊháittáá

  Noun - suájá:
    suájá+N+Sg+Nom:  suáj̣á
    suájá+N+Sg+Gen:  suájá
    suájá+N+Sg+Acc:  suájá
    suájá+N+Sg+Ill:  suáj̣án
    suájá+N+Sg+Loc:  suáˊjáást
    suájá+N+Sg+Com:  [suáj̣áin, suáˊjáin]
    suájá+N+Sg+Abe:  suáˊjáttáá
    suájá+N+Ess:  suáiján
    suájá+N+Par: suáijád
    suájá+N+Pl+Nom:  suáˊjáh
    suájá+N+Pl+Gen:  [suájái, suáˊjái]
    suájá+N+Pl+Acc:  suáˊjáid
    suájá+N+Pl+Ill:  suájáid
    suájá+N+Pl+Loc:  suáˊjáin
    suájá+N+Pl+Com:  suáˊjáiguin
    suájá+N+Pl+Abe:  suáˊjáittáá

  Noun - vuárkká:
    vuárkká+N+Sg+Nom:  vuárˊkká
    vuárkká+N+Sg+Gen:  vuárhá
    vuárkká+N+Sg+Acc:  vuárhá
    vuárkká+N+Sg+Ill:  vuárkán
    vuárkká+N+Sg+Loc:  vuárhást
    vuárkká+N+Sg+Com:  vuárˊháin
    vuárkká+N+Sg+Abe:  vuáˊrháttáá
    vuárkká+N+Ess:  vuárkkán
    vuárkká+N+Par: vuárkˊkád
    vuárkká+N+Pl+Nom:  vuárháh
    vuárkká+N+Pl+Gen: [vuárhái, vuáˊrhái]
    vuárkká+N+Pl+Acc:  vuárháid
    vuárkká+N+Pl+Ill:  vuárˊháid
    vuárkká+N+Pl+Loc:  vuárháin
    vuárkká+N+Pl+Com:  vuáˊrháiguin
    vuárkká+N+Pl+Abe:  vuáˊrháittáá

  Noun - kuávská:
    kuávská+N+Sg+Nom:  kuávˊská
    kuávská+N+Sg+Gen:  kuávská
    kuávská+N+Sg+Acc:  kuávská
    kuávská+N+Sg+Ill:  kuávskán
    kuávská+N+Sg+Loc:  kuávskást
    kuávská+N+Sg+Com:  kuávˊskáin
    kuávská+N+Sg+Abe:  kuáˊvskáttáá
    kuávská+N+Ess:  kuávˊskán
    kuávská+N+Par: kuávˊskád
    kuávská+N+Pl+Nom:  kuávskáh
    kuávská+N+Pl+Gen: [kuávskái, kuáˊvskái]
    kuávská+N+Pl+Acc:  kuávskáid
    kuávská+N+Pl+Ill:  kuávˊskáid
    kuávská+N+Pl+Loc:  kuávskáin
    kuávská+N+Pl+Com:  kuáˊvskáiguin
    kuávská+N+Pl+Abe:  kuáˊvskáittáá

  Noun - kuáhčá:
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Nom:  kuáhˊčá
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Gen:  kuávčá
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Acc:  kuávčá
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Ill:  kuáhˊčán
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Loc:  kuávčást
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Com:  kuávˊččáin
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Abe:  kuáˊvčáttáá
    kuáhčá+N+Ess:  kuáhˊčán
    kuáhčá+N+Par: kuáhˊčád
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Nom:  kuávčáh
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Gen: [kuávčái, kuáˊvčái]
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Acc:  kuávčáid
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Ill:  kuávˊččáid
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Loc:  kuávčáin
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Com:  kuáˊvčáiguin
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Abe:  kuáˊvčáittáá

  Noun - sááhá:
    sááhá+N+Sg+Nom:  sááhá
    sááhá+N+Sg+Gen:  sááhá
    sááhá+N+Sg+Acc: sááhá
    sááhá+N+Sg+Ill:  sááhán
    sááhá+N+Sg+Loc:  sááhást
    sááhá+N+Sg+Com:  sááháin
    sááhá+N+Sg+Abe:  sáˊháttáá
    sááhá+N+Ess:  sááhhán
    sááhá+N+Par: sááhhád
    sááhá+N+Pl+Nom:  sááháh
    sááhá+N+Pl+Gen:  [sááhái, sáhái]
    sááhá+N+Pl+Acc:  sááháid
    sááhá+N+Pl+Ill:  sááháid
    sááhá+N+Pl+Loc:  sááháin
    sááhá+N+Pl+Com:  sáˊháiguin
    sááhá+N+Pl+Abe:  sáˊháittáá

  Noun - páájá:
    páájá+N+Sg+Nom:  pááj̣á
    páájá+N+Sg+Gen:  páájá
    páájá+N+Sg+Acc:  páájá
    páájá+N+Sg+Ill:  pááj̣án
    páájá+N+Sg+Loc:  páájást
    páájá+N+Sg+Com:  páájáin
    páájá+N+Sg+Abe:  páˊjáttáá
    páájá+N+Ess:  pááiján
    páájá+N+Par: pááijád
    páájá+N+Pl+Nom:  páájáh
    páájá+N+Pl+Gen:  [páájái, pájái]
    páájá+N+Pl+Acc:  páájáid
    páájá+N+Pl+Ill:  [pááj̣áid, páijáid]
    páájá+N+Pl+Loc:  páájáin
    páájá+N+Pl+Com:  páˊjáiguin
    páájá+N+Pl+Abe:  páˊjáittáá

  Noun - čááná:
    čááná+N+Sg+Nom:  čááṇá
    čááná+N+Sg+Gen:  čááná
    čááná+N+Sg+Acc:  čááná
    čááná+N+Sg+Ill:  čááṇán
    čááná+N+Sg+Loc:  čáánást
    čááná+N+Sg+Com:  čáánáin
    čááná+N+Sg+Abe:  čáˊnáttáá
    čááná+N+Ess:  čáánnán
    čááná+N+Par:  čáánnád
    čááná+N+Pl+Nom:  čáánáh
    čááná+N+Pl+Gen: [čáánái, čáˊnái]
    čááná+N+Pl+Acc:  čáánáid
    čááná+N+Pl+Ill:  čáánáid
    čááná+N+Pl+Loc:  čáánáin
    čááná+N+Pl+Com:  čáˊnáiguin
    čááná+N+Pl+Abe:  čáˊnáittáá

  Noun - čááná: # á-stems
    čááná+N+Sg+Nom: čááṇá
    čááná+N+Sg+Gen: čááná
    čááná+N+Sg+Acc: čááná
    čááná+N+Sg+Ill: čááṇán
    čááná+N+Sg+Loc: čáánást
    čááná+N+Sg+Com: čáánáin
    čááná+N+Sg+Abe: čánáttáá
    čááná+N+Ess: čáánnán
    čááná+N+Par: čáánnád
    čááná+N+Pl+Nom: čáánáh
    čááná+N+Pl+Gen: čáánái
    čááná+N+Pl+Acc: čáánáid
    čááná+N+Pl+Ill: čáánáid
    čááná+N+Pl+Loc: čáánáin
    čááná+N+Pl+Com: čánáiguin
    čááná+N+Pl+Abe: čánáittáá

  Noun - čiähá:
    čiähá+N+Sg+Nom:  [čiäḥá, čiähá]
    čiähá+N+Sg+Gen:  čiäṿá
    čiähá+N+Sg+Acc:  čiäṿá
    čiähá+N+Sg+Ill:  čiäḥán
    čiähá+N+Sg+Loc:  čiäṿást
    čiähá+N+Sg+Com:  čiävváin
    čiähá+N+Sg+Abe:  čiäˊváttáá
    čiähá+N+Ess:  čiähhán
    čiähá+N+Par: čiähhád
    čiähá+N+Pl+Nom:  čiäṿáh
    čiähá+N+Pl+Gen: [čiäṿái, čiäˊvái]
    čiähá+N+Pl+Acc:  čiäṿáid
    čiähá+N+Pl+Ill:  čiävváid
    čiähá+N+Pl+Loc:  čiäṿáin
    čiähá+N+Pl+Com:  čiäˊváiguin
    čiähá+N+Pl+Abe:  čiäˊváittáá

  Noun - čiähá: # á-stems
    čiähá+N+Sg+Nom: čiäḥá
    čiähá+N+Sg+Gen: čiäṿá
    čiähá+N+Sg+Ill: čiäḥán
    čiähá+N+Sg+Loc: čiäṿást
    čiähá+N+Sg+Com: čiävváin
    čiähá+N+Ess: čiähhán
    čiähá+N+Par: čiähhád
    čiähá+N+Pl+Nom: čiäṿáh
    čiähá+N+Pl+Gen: [čiäṿái, čiäˊṿ̣ái]
    čiähá+N+Pl+Acc: čiäṿáid
    čiähá+N+Pl+Ill: čiävváid
    čiähá+N+Pl+Loc: čiäṿáin
    čiähá+N+Pl+Com: čiäˊṿáiguin
    čiähá+N+Pl+Abe: čiäˊṿáittáá

  Noun - kiälkká:
    kiälkká+N+Sg+Nom:  kiälˊkká
    kiälkká+N+Sg+Gen:  kiälhá
    kiälkká+N+Sg+Acc:  kiälhá
    kiälkká+N+Sg+Ill:  kiälkán
    kiälkká+N+Sg+Loc:  kiälhást
    kiälkká+N+Sg+Com:  kiälˊháin
    kiälkká+N+Sg+Abe:  kiäˊlháttáá
    kiälkká+N+Ess:  kiälkkán
    kiälkká+N+Par:  kiälkkád
    kiälkká+N+Pl+Nom:  kiälháh
    kiälkká+N+Pl+Gen: [kiälhái, kiäˊlhái]
    kiälkká+N+Pl+Acc:  kiälháid
    kiälkká+N+Pl+Ill:  kiälˊháid
    kiälkká+N+Pl+Loc:  kiälháin
    kiälkká+N+Pl+Com:  kiäˊlháiguin
    kiälkká+N+Pl+Abe:  kiäˊlháittáá

  Noun - miärkká:
    miärkká+N+Sg+Nom:  miärˊkká
    miärkká+N+Sg+Gen:  miärhá
    miärkká+N+Sg+Acc:  miärhá
    miärkká+N+Sg+Ill:  miärkán
    miärkká+N+Sg+Loc:  miärhást
    miärkká+N+Sg+Com:  miärˊháin
    miärkká+N+Sg+Abe:  miäˊrháttáá
    miärkká+N+Ess:  miärˊkkán
    miärkká+N+Par:  miärˊkkád
    miärkká+N+Pl+Nom:  miärháh
    miärkká+N+Pl+Gen: [miärhái, miäˊrhái]
    miärkká+N+Pl+Acc:  miärháid
    miärkká+N+Pl+Ill:  miärˊháid
    miärkká+N+Pl+Loc:  miärháin
    miärkká+N+Pl+Com:  miäˊrháiguin
    miärkká+N+Pl+Abe:  miäˊrháittáá

  Noun - riävská:
    riävská+N+Sg+Nom:  riävˊská
    riävská+N+Sg+Gen:  riävská
    riävská+N+Sg+Acc:  riävská
    riävská+N+Sg+Ill:  riävskán
    riävská+N+Sg+Loc:  riävskást
    riävská+N+Sg+Com:  riävˊskáin
    riävská+N+Sg+Abe:  riäˊvskáttáá
    riävská+N+Ess:  riävˊskán
    riávská+N+Par: riävˊskán
    riävská+N+Pl+Nom:  riävskáh
    riävská+N+Pl+Gen: [riävskái, riäˊvskái]
    riävská+N+Pl+Acc:  riävskáid
    riävská+N+Pl+Ill:  riävˊskáid
    riävská+N+Pl+Loc:  riävskáin
    riävská+N+Pl+Com:  riäˊvskáiguin
    riävská+N+Pl+Abe:  riäˊvskáittáá

  Noun - riätká:
    riätká+N+Sg+Nom:  riätˊká
    riätká+N+Sg+Gen:  riäđhá
    riätká+N+Sg+Acc:  riäđhá
    riätká+N+Sg+Ill:  riätkán
    riätká+N+Sg+Loc:  riäđhást
    riätká+N+Sg+Com:  riäđˊháin
    riätká+N+Sg+Abe:  riäˊđháttáá
    riätká+N+Ess:  riätˊkán
    riätká+N+Ess:  riätˊkád
    riätká+N+Pl+Nom:  riäđháh
    riätká+N+Pl+Gen: [riäđhái, riäˊđhái]
    riätká+N+Pl+Acc:  riäđháid
    riätká+N+Pl+Ill:  riäđˊháid
    riätká+N+Pl+Loc:  riäđháin
    riätká+N+Pl+Com:  riäˊđháiguin
    riätká+N+Pl+Abe:  riäˊđháittáá

  Noun - vuástá:
    vuástá+N+Sg+Nom:  vuásˊtá
    vuástá+N+Sg+Gen:  vuástá
    vuástá+N+Sg+Acc:  vuástá
    vuástá+N+Sg+Ill:  vuástán
    vuástá+N+Sg+Loc:  vuástást
    vuástá+N+Sg+Com:  vuásˊtáin
    vuástá+N+Sg+Abe:  vuáˊstáttáá
    vuástá+N+Ess:  vuásˊtán
    vuástá+N+Par:  vuásˊtád
    vuástá+N+Pl+Nom:  vuástáh
    vuástá+N+Pl+Gen: [vuástái, vuáˊstái]
    vuástá+N+Pl+Acc:  vuástáid
    vuástá+N+Pl+Ill:  vuásˊtáid
    vuástá+N+Pl+Loc:  vuástáin
    vuástá+N+Pl+Com:  vuáˊstáiguin
    vuástá+N+Pl+Abe:  vuáˊstáittáá
